Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2625SV (3) 91 jm/md S.F. 598 Section 1. Section 441.72, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 441.72 Assessment of platted lots and development property . 3 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 , when a subdivision 4 plat is recorded pursuant to chapter 354 , the individual lots 5 within the subdivision plat shall continue to be classified 6 and assessed for taxation in the manner the property was prior 7 to the recording of the plat and the individual lots shall not 8 be assessed in excess of the total assessment of the land as 9 acreage or unimproved property . The assessor shall not change 10 the classification or assessment of the individual lots for 11 five years after the recording of the plat or until the lot is 12 actually improved with permanent construction, whichever occurs 13 first. When an individual lot has been improved with permanent 14 construction, the lot shall be assessed for taxation purposes 15 as provided in chapter 428 and this chapter . 16 2. For subdivision plats recorded pursuant to chapter 17 354 on or after January 1, 2004, but before January 1, 2011, 18 the individual lots within the subdivision plat shall not 19 be assessed in excess of the total assessment of the land 20 as acreage or unimproved property for eight years after the 21 recording of the plat or until the lot is actually improved 22 with permanent construction, whichever occurs first. When an 23 individual lot has been improved with permanent construction, 24 the lot shall be assessed for taxation purposes as provided in 25 chapter 428 and this chapter . 26 a. Unless the owner elects to withdraw the property from the 27 classification and assessment provisions of this subsection, 28 property acquired for development on or after January 1, 2020, 29 or property owned for development upon which development 30 activities occur on or after January 1, 2020, shall continue 31 to be classified and assessed for taxation in the manner the 32 property was prior to the acquisition or commencement of 33 development activities. The assessor shall not change the 34 classification or assessment of the property or a lot on the 35 -1- LSB 2625SV (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 4 S.F. 598 property while development is occurring until the property or 1 lot is improved with a new permanent structure or is sold. 2 Upon the occurrence of one or more such events, the property 3 or lot shall be assessed for taxation purposes as provided in 4 chapter 428 and this chapter. 5 b. If the owner of property described in paragraph âaâ 6 elects to withdraw the property from the provisions of 7 paragraph âaâ , the owner shall notify the assessor. The 8 notification must be provided to the assessor no later than 9 March 1 of the assessment year for which the owner elects to 10 withdraw the property. The property or lot that has been 11 withdrawn shall be subject to subsection 1, if applicable. 12 c. As used in this subsection, âdevelopmentâ means any of 13 the following: 14 (1) A reconstruction or alteration of the size or material 15 change in the external appearance of an existing structure on 16 a lot. 17 (2) A change in the intensity of the use of lots or a change 18 in zoning, including an increase in the number of dwelling 19 units in an existing structure, or further subdividing the 20 lots to increase the number of dwelling units, commercial 21 structures, manufacturing establishments, or offices. 22 (3) Clearing the lots in anticipation of construction. 23 (4) Depositing fill dirt on the lots in anticipation of 24 construction. 25 (5) Installing streets and public utilities on the lots. 26 3. This section does not apply to special assessment levies. 27 Sec. 2. REPEAL. Section 405.1, Code 2025, is repealed. 28 Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION. Nothing in this Act shall be 29 construed to require the refund or modification of property 30 taxes that are attributable to assessment years beginning 31 before January 1, 2025, or the adjustment of property 32 assessments for assessment years beginning before January 1, 33 2025. 34 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 35 -2- LSB 2625SV (3) 91 jm/md 2/ 4 S.F. 598 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 1 Sec. 5. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 2 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 3 1, 2025. 4